District of Columbia statutes.
7-1001

Equal access to public places.

Persons with physical or mental disabilities have the same right as the able-bodied to the full and free use of the streets, highways, sidewalks, walkways, public buildings, public facilities, and other public places in the District of Columbia.

History

Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 970, Pub. L. 92-515, § 1
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 25(a), 53 DCR 6198
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-291, § 2(a), 60 DCR 2351

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-1831.03, § 7-1004, and § 7-1007.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1701.
1973 Ed., § 6-1501.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “other persons with physical disabilities” for “the otherwise physically disabled”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-291 substituted “Persons with physical or mental disabilities” for “The blind and other persons with physical disabilities”.